Wisconsin, session 2025, AB556.
do enact as follows:AB556,11Section 1. 16.42 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB556,2,6216.42 (1) (intro.) All agencies, other than the legislature and the courts, no 3later than September 15 of each even-numbered year, in the form and content 4prescribed by the department, but subject to the requirements of sub. (5), shall 5prepare and forward to the department and to the legislative fiscal bureau the 6following program and financial information:AB556,27Section 2. 16.42 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB556,2,11816.42 (5) (a) In this subsection, “zero−based budgeting” means the 9compilation of a budget in which each component is justified on the basis of cost, 10need, and relation to the statutory responsibilities of the state agency for which the 11budget is made.AB556,2,1712(b) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., beginning with the 2027-29 fiscal 13biennium, the department shall require 20 percent of agencies under sub. (1) to 14submit their biennial budget requests prepared using the principles of zero−based 15budgeting for each of the agency’s activities, units, and programs. In each fiscal 16biennium thereafter, the department shall require a different 20 percent of the 17agencies to submit their biennial budget requests in this form.AB556,2,20182. The department shall require each agency to submit its biennial budget 19request prepared using the principles of zero−based budgeting for each of its 20activities, units, and programs at least once during any 5 consecutive fiscal biennia.AB556,31Section 3. 16.423 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB556,3,3216.423 (3) (a) A description of each appropriation of the state agency and a 3statement identifying the intended goal of the appropriation.AB556,44Section 4. 16.423 (3) (f) of the statutes is created to read:AB556,3,8516.423 (3) (f) For each appropriation of the state agency, an analysis of 6whether the appropriation 100 percent succeeded in meeting the intended goal 7identified under par. (a) and, if not, an explanation as to why the appropriation did 8not 100 percent succeed in meeting the intended goal.AB556,59Section 5. 16.423 (3m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB556,3,151016.423 (3m) A report filed under this section shall be in a form that is 11consistent with the form used by a state agency that filed a base budget review 12report under s. 16.423, 2007 stats., and modified to capture the additional 13information required to be reported under sub. (3), including the information 14reported under sub. (3) (f). The agency shall make the reports available on its 15website.AB556,616Section 6. 16.46 (5g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB556,3,191716.46 (5g) A summary of the information submitted to the department by 18state agencies under s. 16.423, and the hyperlink to the agency's website where the 19the reports submitted by state agencies are available under s. 16.423 (3m).AB556,3,2020